Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 34 Food Donations

21-34-1.
[Repealed.]

21-34-2.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 423, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 97, § 1, effective July 8, 2019; P.L. 2019, ch. 123, § 1, effective July 8, 2019.

21-34-3.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 386, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 97, § 1, effective July 8, 2019; P.L. 2019, ch. 123, § 1, effective July 8, 2019.